Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.440

Alternative direct petition method—Ordinance providing for annexation.

Following the hearing, the council or commission shall determine by ordinance whether annexation shall be made. Subject to the provisions of RCW 35.13.410, 35.13.460, and 35.21.005, they may annex all or any portion of the proposed area but may not include in the annexation any property not described in the petition. Upon passage of the ordinance a certified copy shall be filed with the board of county commissioners of the county in which the annexed property is located.

[ 2003 c 331 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—2003 c 331: See notes following RCW 35.13.410.